District of Columbia statutes.
16-3704

Undertaking to abide judgment of the court.

At the time of filing a complaint in replevin, the plaintiff shall enter into an undertaking by himself or his agent with surety, approved by the clerk, to abide by and perform the judgment of the court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 604, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

Bonds and undertakings, see § 28-2501 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 16-3704.
1973 Ed., § 16-3704.

Prior Codifications